Hawaii statutes.
§666-8 Service. The summons shall be
served as provided by the rules of court.

In the event that any defendant cannot be
served within the circuit, service may be made in any part of the State.

If any defendant cannot be served with process
within the State, and the facts shall appear by affidavit or otherwise to the
satisfaction of the court, service as to such defendant may be made according
to the special order of the court, but such order shall in any case include a
direction to the officer to leave a certified copy of the complaint and summons
with some agent or employee of mature years of the defendant, provided the
agent or employee can be found upon the premises or elsewhere within the
circuit, and also to affix in a conspicuous place upon the premises (as upon
the wall of any store, shop, dwelling, or other building thereon, and if there
is no such building, then upon some other permanent object thereon, as a tree
or fence) a certified copy of the complaint and summons. The order shall
further require that a certified copy of the complaint and summons be sent to
the defendant by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, unless it is
shown by affidavit or otherwise to the satisfaction of the court that the
address of the defendant is unknown and cannot be ascertained. [CC 1859, §941;
am L 1905, c 95, §2; RL 1925, §2781; RL 1935, §4018; RL 1945, §10407; RL 1955,
§240-8; HRS §666-8; am L 1972, c 90, §8(e)]

Rules of Court

See DCRCP rule 4.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next